Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
CHAPTER 184 Public Road Districts

184.010.
Public road districts authorized in counties.

Public road districts may be established in counties for the purpose of providing the general public and persons residing upon or owning property adjacent to such roads with all-weather roads, appropriate drainage of said roads and sidewalks on either or both sides of said roads with reasonable maintenance during the existence of the road district.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 65, § 1; 1952, ch. 11, § 1; 1968, ch. 55, § 1; 1980, ch. 56, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 2014, ch. 92, § 264, effective January 1, 2015.

184.020.
Establishment of public road district — Preparation of map — Estimate of cost.

A public road district may be established in accordance with the procedures of KRS

65.810

to improve any public road (which is neither a county road nor a state road) in the following areas:

Within cities containing a population equal to or greater than three thousand (3,000) but less than twenty thousand (20,000);

Within cities containing a population of less than one thousand (1,000) that are located within counties that contain a consolidated local government or a city with a population equal to or greater than twenty thousand (20,000); or

Within an area that abuts a public road, which is neither a county road nor a state road, that is in an unincorporated area in a county that contains a city with a population equal to or greater than three thousand (3,000).

In addition to the information required to be submitted to the fiscal court pursuant to KRS

65.810

, the sponsors shall prepare or have prepared for them a map of that section of such public road which they desire to have improved. Such map shall show the boundary lines and terminal points of the road desired to be improved and shall set forth on such map the names of the owners of all property and the number of linear feet owned by them abutting upon such road, the location and size of drainage ditches and sidewalks. The sponsors of said road district shall also have estimated for them by an engineer, who must be a private engineer licensed by the Commonwealth of Kentucky, pursuant to KRS Chapter 322, the approximate cost of constructing the improvements desired and reasonable maintenance for the duration of the road district, together with a statement of the approximate cost which shall be borne by each owner of property abutting on the road, determined by the number of linear feet of property owned by each abutting property holder.

For the purposes of this section, the population of a city shall be determined by using data from the most recent federal decennial census.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 65, § 2; 1952, ch. 11, § 2; 1968, ch. 55, § 2; 1980, ch. 56, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 64, § 14, effective July 13, 1984; 2014, ch. 92, § 265, effective January 1, 2015.

184.030.
What petition to contain. [Repealed.]

184.040.
Examination of submitted plan of service by county road engineer.

When a petition and plan of service have been submitted to the fiscal court as provided in KRS

65.810

and

184.020

the fiscal court shall turn these documents over to the county engineer for his consideration. The county engineer shall, within ten (10) days from his receipt of such documents from the fiscal court, examine said documents, examine the road proposed to be improved, or maintained, study the estimates of the cost and type of surface proposed to be used, or study the estimates of the cost and type of the contemplated maintenance and return to the fiscal court with recommendations of approval or disapproval the documents theretofore delivered to him.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 65, § 4; 1966, ch. 239, § 158; 1968, ch. 55, § 4; 1984, ch. 64, § 15, effective July 13, 1984.

184.050.
Trial of objections — Appeal. [Repealed.]

184.060.
Appointment of board of directors — Qualifications — Term — Vacancies — Removal of member.

In the event that a road district is created pursuant to KRS

65.810

and

184.020

, the county judge/executive shall appoint, with the approval of the fiscal court, three (3) persons as members of the road district board of directors, whose duty it shall be to control and manage the affairs of the district. Each director shall be at least twenty-five (25) years of age, shall be an owner of land abutting upon the road to be improved and shall have lived on such land for a period of at least six (6) months prior to his appointment. The members of the first board of directors shall hold their offices, respectively, for two (2), three (3) and four (4) years from the date of their appointment, and thereafter each director shall be appointed for a term of four (4) years. Vacancies resulting from any cause other than expiration of a term of office shall be filled by the county judge/executive and only for the unexpired term.

A member of the board of directors may be removed from office as provided by KRS

65.007

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 65, § 6; 1976 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 173, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 325, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 18, § 19, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 64, § 16, effective July 13, 1984.

184.070.
Oath and bond of directors.

Each director, before entering upon his official duties, shall take and subscribe to an oath before the county clerk that he will honestly, faithfully and impartially perform the duties of his office and that he will not be interested directly or indirectly in any contract let for the purpose of carrying out any of the provisions of this chapter. Said oath shall be filed among the minutes of the road district and noted on the minutes of the county judge/executive.

Each director shall give a good and sufficient bond in an amount to be fixed by order entered by the county judge/executive, said bond to be approved of by the county judge/executive and to provide for the faithful performance of his duties and as security for all moneys coming into his hands. The cost of such bonds shall be borne by the road district.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 65, § 7; 1978, ch. 384, § 326, effective June 17, 1978.

184.080.
Powers and duties of board of directors — Officers — Employees — Compensation — Regulations — Approval of accounts and acts of directors — Compliance with KRS 65A.010 to 65A.090 — Dissolution of district.

The board of directors, which is hereby declared to be the governing body of the road district, shall keep a record of its proceedings, shall adopt and have a seal, and shall exercise all powers and manage and control all the affairs and property of the district.

The board of directors shall elect one (1) of its members chairman, one (1) secretary and one (1) treasurer.

The board may employ an attorney and an engineer, who shall serve in such capacities during the pleasure of the board and for such reasonable compensation as may be fixed by the board and approved by order of the county judge/executive.

Each member of the board may receive a salary of not in excess of two hundred dollars ($200) per annum for his services, which salary shall be fixed at the first meeting of said board, and approved of by order of the county judge/executive, and thereafter may be decreased as the duties of the members decrease.

The board may adopt such rules and regulations as are necessary for its proper functioning.

The chairman, secretary and treasurer of the district shall perform such duties as are usually performed by such officers.

The county judge/executive, by method similar to that for approving settlements of fiduciaries, shall approve the accounts and acts of all directors upon death, resignation or at expiration of their term of office, which county judge/executive approval shall relieve the surety upon the bond of such director, the cost of which shall be a charge against the district.

The district board shall comply with the provisions of KRS

65A.010

to

65A.090

.

When the affairs of the district have been completed, the directors and officers shall by verified petition ask the county judge/executive for a dissolution of the district, which petition shall include an accounting of all moneys received and disbursed by the district and shall be referred to the county judge/executive and when approved by the county judge/executive shall release said officers, directors and their sureties, the cost of which shall be a charge against the district.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 65, § 8; 1952, ch. 11, § 3; 1978, ch. 384, § 327, effective June 17, 1978; 2013, ch. 40, § 63, effective March 21, 2013.

184.090.
Meetings of board.

The board of directors shall fix the time and place for regular meetings of the board and may hold such other meetings as are called by the chairman or any two (2) members of the board upon two (2) days’ notice in writing to all members of the board. A majority of the directors shall constitute a quorum, and the concurrence of the majority in any matter within the scope of its duties shall be decisive. All actions taken by the directors shall be by resolution.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 65, § 9.

184.100.
Approval of plans and specifications by board — Preliminary costs.

Upon qualification of the members of the board of directors, the board shall take up with its engineer the plans and specifications proposed for the construction or maintenance of the road, and may make such changes therein as may, within the scope of the improvement or maintenance petition for, appear necessary. The cost of preparation of such plans and specifications and any other reasonable costs borne by the sponsors of the project prior to the organization of the district which are properly proved by vouchers shall be included in the cost of construction of the project and shall be repaid to such sponsors out of moneys collected or received for the construction of such project.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 65, § 10; 1968, ch. 55, § 6.

184.110.
Advertisement for bids for road construction or maintenance — Letting of contract.

Upon the final approval of the plans and specifications, the board of directors shall adopt a resolution approving and accepting said plan, and advertising for bids for the construction or maintenance of the road according to such plans and specifications. The board shall advertise for bids for such work by publication pursuant to KRS Chapter 424. The contract for such work shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder, who shall give bond with approved and adequate security for the faithful performance of the contract. The notice of the letting of the contract shall specify the general nature of the work to be done, the time and date of reception of bids, and the place where detailed information as to the work to be performed can be obtained. All bids shall be opened and read at the time and place specified in the notice, and the board of directors may either accept the lowest and best bid or, in their sound discretion, reject all bids and readvertise.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 65, § 11; 1966, ch. 239, § 159; 1968, ch. 55, § 7.

184.120.
Determination of cost — Assessment against owners.

When a bid has been accepted and the cost of constructing the road improvement or the cost of the maintenance has thus been determined, the board of directors shall prepare a statement of all costs of constructing the project or providing road maintenance (including the cost of organizing the district, preliminary expenses, fees of directors, engineer and attorney, and a sum sufficient to provide for any unforeseen contingencies up to and including the completion of the project, together with a fund adequate to provide for continuing costs of the district which may include reasonable maintenance of the roads, drainage, ditches and sidewalks for a period of ten (10) years) and shall thereupon determine the front-foot cost of constructing the road improvement or the front-foot cost of providing road maintenance. The board of directors shall then assess against each owner of the property abutting upon the road improved or maintained within the limits of the district that proportion of the cost of constructing the entire improvement or that proportion of the cost of providing proper maintenance which his front footage abutting upon the road bears to the total front footage of all properties abutting upon the road within the district. In determining the total front footage intersection shall be included.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 65, § 12; 1952, ch. 11, § 4; 1968, ch. 55, § 8.

184.130.
Lien of assessments.

The assessment made by the board of directors against each owner of property abutting upon the road improvement shall be and become a lien on the property of such owner and shall be prior and superior to all other liens except those of taxes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 65, § 13.

184.140.
Notice of assessment — Methods of payment.

The board of directors shall notify each property owner in writing of the assessment made against him and shall also cause printed notices setting forth the assessments against each property owner to be posted in at least ten (10) public places along the road to be improved or maintained. The property owner may pay the assessment against his property in cash without interest within thirty (30) days from the date of the notice, or may elect to pay the assessment by paying the assessment in ten (10) equal annual installments, the first of which shall be paid within such thirty (30) days without interest, and an agreement executed to pay the other nine (9) installments annually with interest at the rate or rates or method of determining rates as the board of directors determines, payable annually. The notice of assessment shall state the terms.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 65, § 14; 1968, ch. 55, § 9; 1996, ch. 274, § 45, effective July 15, 1996.

184.150.
Agreements for payment on ten-year plan — When payments due.

Any property owner who desires to exercise the privilege of payment by installment shall, before the expiration of said thirty (30) days, pay in cash one-tenth (1/10) of the assessment against him and enter into an agreement in writing with the road district that, in consideration of such privilege, he will make no objection to any illegality or irregularity in the assessment, levy or imposition of the assessment against his property. Any property owner entering into such an agreement shall be concluded thereby and shall waive any defense which he might otherwise have against the payment of the assessment levied against his property. Said agreement shall be filed and recorded among the records of the board of directors of the road district, and shall be binding upon any successor in title to the property.

After the first payment of one-tenth (1/10) of the assessment shall have been made in cash at the time the property owner elects to pay the balance on the installment plan, the remaining installments shall be due and payable one (1) each year on the anniversary of the last day of the thirty-day (30) period for executing the installment payment agreement, together with interest as herein provided for nine (9) years.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 65, § 15.

184.160.
Entire assessment due in absence of agreement — Interest — Collection.

In all cases where agreements to pay assessments in installments have not been filed within the time limit, the entire amount of the assessment shall be payable in cash. Any assessment not paid within thirty (30) days from the date of notice, shall bear interest at the rate or rates or method of determining rates as the board of directors deems best from the date of the assessment and levy, and shall be collected by suit.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 65, § 16; 1996, ch. 274, § 46, effective July 15, 1996.

184.170.
Execution of agreement by life tenant or person under disability.

If any property against which an assessment has been levied is owned by an infant, by a person adjudged mentally disabled or a life tenant, the agreement herein provided for may be executed by the statutory guardian of such infant or the guardian, conservator or curator of such mentally disabled person, with the same effect as if executed by a person free from disability, or by the life tenant, whose agreement shall be binding upon the owner of the fee.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 65, § 17; 1982, ch. 141, § 63, effective July 1, 1982.

184.180.
Privilege of prepayment.

Any person may, at any interest-payment period after the fifth installment of his assessment has become due and has been paid, pay the entire balance of such assessment against his property with accrued interest to the next succeeding interest period. In the event that an owner who has entered into an installment payment agreement desires to pay his assessment in full before the fifth installment thereof has become due, he may pay the same by paying the face amount of his obligation, plus all installments of interest up to and including the next interest period following the fifth installment.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 65, § 18.

184.190.
Notice of maturity of installments.

It shall be the duty of the board of directors to cause to be mailed to each property owner liable for an assessment, to his last known address, a notice of the amount falling due ten (10) days prior to the date on which any installment of principal becomes due. The failure of such property owner to receive a notice shall neither exempt him from liability for the assessment nor prejudice the collection thereof or the enforcement of the lien therefor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 65, § 19.

184.200.
Penalty in case of installment default — Acceleration — Enforcement of lien.

If any person liable for any part of said assessment defaults in the payment of any installment thereof or interest thereon for one (1) month after payment becomes due, a penalty of ten percent (10%) of the installment in arrears shall be added thereto, which shall constitute a like lien as the assessment, and thereafter all unpaid installments of the assessment against such person shall, at the option of the district, or of any holder of an apportionment warrant or bond secured thereby, forthwith become due and payable. It shall be the duty of the district, for the use and benefit of the owner or owners of such bonds or apportionment warrants, to institute, in its own name and at its own cost, proper proceedings for the enforcement of such lien, except that the costs of the action, including attorneys’ fees, shall be added to the amount of the delinquent assessment and shall be first payable out of the moneys received through enforcement of the district’s lien. If the district fails to institute such proceedings for thirty (30) days after notice of such default, any owner of a bond or apportionment warrant secured by such lien may, in his own name and on his own behalf and on the behalf of other owners of such bonds or apportionment warrants, institute and prosecute such proceedings in any court of competent jurisdiction.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 65, § 20.

184.210.
Application of money from installment payments, interest and penalties.

It shall be the duty of the district treasurer promptly to apply all moneys paid in on installments of principal or interest and on penalties to the payment of the bonds and coupons or apportionment warrants issued hereunder. If the fund accumulated from the collection of assessments, interest and penalties be more than sufficient to pay all principal and interest due, said treasurer shall refund to each person paying an assessment for the project a proportionate amount of the excess. Failure on the part of the district to collect any payment when due shall create no liability against the district and shall create no liability against the members of the board of directors, except for gross negligence or malfeasance in office.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 65, § 21.

184.220.
Foreclosure of liens — Redemption.

In the event that a property owner fails or refuses to pay his assessment in cash within thirty (30) days or to pay one-tenth (1/10) of his assessment in cash within thirty (30) days and execute an agreement to pay the balance in nine (9) equal annual installments with interest, as aforesaid, or in the event that a property owner fails or refuses to pay any semiannual installment of interest or annual installment of principal due under such agreement when the same becomes due, then the board of directors shall, after making reasonable efforts to collect the same, direct its attorney to file a suit in equity to foreclose the lien of the road district against such delinquent property owner. In all actions to enforce liens, a copy of the resolution of the board of directors authorizing the work to be done and assessing the lien against the property owners, attested by the secretary of said board, shall be filed with the petition and shall constitute prima facie evidence of all facts necessary to be established by the plaintiff in such an action to entitle it to relief. In such actions, the court shall provide in its order confirming any report of sale that any defendant or defendants or anyone claiming through him or them may, within two (2) years from the date of the order confirming a report of sale, redeem the property sold by paying to the purchaser the purchase price, with interest thereon from the day of sale at the rate of ten percent (10%) per annum to the date of payment; in the event that there be no redemption within the time allowed, the order of confirmation shall be final and a deed shall be executed to the purchaser or his assignee.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 65, § 22.

184.230.
Lis pendens notices make liens effective.

At the end of the thirty (30) day period following the notification of all property owners of the assessment against their property, the attorney for the district, upon receiving instructions so to do, shall file in the office of the county clerk a lis pendens notice against each parcel of property the owner of which has entered into an agreement to pay his assessment in installments or who has failed or refused either to pay his assessment in cash or to enter into an agreement, and the lien hereinbefore created shall thereupon be and become effective as against each parcel of property so affected.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 65, § 23.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Lis Pendens, § 312.00.

184.240.
Authority to issue apportionment warrants or road district bonds.

In order to obtain funds sufficient to pay for the construction of the proposed improvement, or sufficient to pay for the reasonable maintenance of the road, being the balance required after the receipt of full cash payments and initial installment payments, but not including in such balance payments due from owners who failed or refused to make full cash payments or to enter into installment payment agreements, the board of directors may, in its discretion, provide by resolution for the issuance of interest-bearing apportionment warrants against each parcel of property or may direct the issuance and sale of road district bonds, as hereinafter provided. No bonds shall be issued unless the aggregate amount of installment payments, subsequent to the first cash payment is one thousand dollars ($1000) or more.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 65, § 24; 1968, ch. 55, § 10.

184.250.
Form of apportionment warrants — Sale.

In the event that the board of directors determines to issue apportionment warrants, the warrants shall be issued against each parcel of property against which there is a lien for an unpaid balance of the assessment, shall bear interest at the rate or rates or method of determining rates deemed proper by the board, be payable at least annually, and shall be payable, as to principal, in nine (9) equal installments. The apportionment warrants may be sold at public or private sale at a price or prices determined by the board of directors or to the contractor, who must accept the same in full payment of the assessments which they represent. The apportionment warrants shall be executed by the chairman and the secretary of the board of directors and may be sold either at public or private sale.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 65, § 25; 1996, ch. 274, § 47, effective July 15, 1996.

184.260.
Road improvement bonds — Form — Term — Tax exemptions — Rights of holders — Payment.

In the event that the board of directors determines to issue road improvement bonds, or road district bonds for maintenance purposes, it may pledge the special assessment and liens on the property for the payment of the principal and interest of the bonds and shall apply the proceeds exclusively to the payment of the bonds. The bonds shall bear a date not less than thirty (30) days nor more than sixty (60) days after the date which was the last day for the execution by the property owners of installment payment agreements. The bonds shall be negotiable and payable to bearer, shall provide for the semiannual or more frequent payment of interest, shall bear coupons to provide for the payment of the interest, shall be numbered consecutively, shall be in denominations of one hundred dollars ($100) or its multiple (provided that any odd amount not in multiple of one hundred dollars ($100) may be included in the last bond to mature), shall be divided into nine (9) series as nearly equal as practicable, one (1) series maturing each year, and shall be payable at the office of the treasurer of the road district or at a bank or trust company named in the bonds. The bonds shall have the name of the road for the improvement or maintenance of which they are issued printed or engraved on the bonds, shall state the character and extent of the improvements, or the character and extent of the contemplated maintenance, shall be signed by the chairman and secretary of the board of directors, and the coupons shall be signed by the secretary either personally or by his engraved or lithographed facsimile signature.

It shall not be necessary in the bonds to recite the steps taken for the improvement of the road, maintenance of the road, or in making the assessment of the cost, but it shall be sufficient to make a general reference to the proceedings and to this chapter. The bonds shall be exempt from all taxation by or in the Commonwealth of Kentucky. The bonds shall convey and transfer to the owner of the bonds all lien, right, title, and interest in and to the assessments and liens upon the respective parcels of land abutting upon the improvement. The liens, until released after payment, shall be security for the bonds and coupons until they are paid.

The bonds shall be subject to prepayment and redemption at any interest period which does not occur within four (4) years from the date of the issue of the bonds. The treasurer of the district shall, when funds have accumulated from any special assessment sufficient to redeem in excess of the next series falling due, by lot select from the next succeeding issue falling due, bonds of a par value equal to the excess in the fund arising from the excess collection and shall advertise by publication pursuant to KRS Chapter 424 the designation and numbers of the bond or bonds so drawn to the effect that on the specified date, the bonds will be redeemed at their par value and accrued interest. The bonds specified in the notice shall bear no interest after the date fixed for their redemption, which provision shall be set forth in substance on the bonds.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 65, § 26; 1966, ch. 239, § 160; 1968, ch. 55, § 11; 1996, ch. 274, § 48, effective July 15, 1996.

184.270.
Sale of bonds — Sources of payment.

The bonds shall be sold at public sale to the highest responsible bidder. The sale shall be advertised by publication pursuant to KRS Chapter 424. If no bidder offers a purchase price deemed acceptable by the board of directors for the purchase of the bonds, then the road district shall have the right to turn them over to the contractor in full payment of that portion of the contract price of the improvement or that portion of the contract price of the contemplated maintenance represented by par and accrued interest. The contractor shall accept the bonds and give credit on the contract price for the full face value and accrued interest on the bonds. Any premium realized from the sale of the bonds and any penalties collected on account of the delinquency of any installment payments of assessments shall be added to the bond fund for the payment of the bonds and interest on the bonds. The bonds and interest shall be payable out of funds actually paid to and collected by the road district on account of the improvement assessment in anticipation of which the bonds were issued.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 65, § 27; 1966, ch. 239, § 161; 1968, ch. 55, § 12; 1996, ch. 274, § 49, effective July 15, 1996.

184.280.
Duties and liabilities of treasurer of district — Bond.

The treasurer of the road district shall be charged with the keeping of all moneys collected on account of the special assessment, interest and penalties, and he shall disburse the same only in payment of the construction costs, apportionment warrants or bonds, as the case may be, or for regular expenses of the district. The treasurer shall be bonded in an amount to be fixed by order entered by the county judge/executive and shall be liable upon his official bond for the safe-keeping of the funds of the district.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 65, § 28; 1978, ch. 384, § 328, effective June 17, 1978.

184.290.
Effect of sale of land on other liens.

The sale of any parcel of land for the nonpayment of any special tax or assessment thereon or for any general tax shall not thereby release said parcel of ground from any other special tax or assessment existing thereon unless the same be asserted in the action in which such parcels are sold.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 65, § 28.

184.300.
Parties in action to foreclose lien — Application of proceeds — Pleadings — Purchase at sale by district.

In any action to foreclose its lien brought by the road district or by any bondholder, it shall not be necessary to make the other bondholders parties. The proceeds of the suit shall be paid to the treasurer of the district and by him applied to the redemption of matured bonds as if the payment had been made without suit. In such a suit, an allegation in substance that the improvement of the road had been duly made and completed and such assessment levied therefor and bonds for unpaid portion of the cost had been issued pursuant to resolutions and proceedings duly adopted and had by the board of directors in accordance with law, shall be a sufficient pleading of such resolutions and proceedings without setting the same out in full or making further reference thereto. The road district is hereby authorized to bid an amount not in excess of its lien and costs for any property sold in such suit.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 65, § 28.